Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0661, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Baby bonus. new text end new text begin (a) The credit amount under subdivision 3 is increased by $400 for each qualifying child of the taxpayer that was born during the taxable year. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must disregard credit amounts under this subdivision for the purposes of determining a taxpayer's minimum credit amount under subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may establish a process to allow a taxpayer to request an advance payment of the additional amount under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end